Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4014
Fee; when assessed.

The fee, provided for by section 2-4012, shall be deducted, as provided by sections 2-4001 to 2-4020, whether such grain sorghum is stored in this state or any other state.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 14.